src/morphology/affixes/propernouns.lexc
LEXICON ACCRA-malsur !!= @CODE@  Vowel-final names where case endings are added directly, no cg. Names that can be both male- and surnames
                            +N+Prop+Sem/Sur:%>            ACCRADECL ;
                            +N+Prop+Sem/Mal:%>            ACCRADECL ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Sg+Attr@U.Cap.Obl@+Err/Orth:%>0000@U.Cap.Obl@ #     ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Attr@U.Cap.Obl@+Err/Orth:%>0000@U.Cap.Obl@ #     ;

!!€gt-norm: Valio # Even-syllable test
!!€ Valio:               Valio+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Sg+Nom
!!€ Valio:               Valio+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Nom
!!€ Valioj:              Valio+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Sg+Ill
!!€ Valios:              Valio+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Sg+Ela

LEXICON ACCRA-plc !!= @CODE@ Vowel-final names where caseendings are added directly, no cg. Place names
                   +N+Prop+Sem/Plc:%>                ACCRADECL-PLC ;
 +N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Gen@U.Cap.Opt@:%>0000@U.Cap.Opt@ VUONAK        ;

!!€gt-norm: Burma # Even-syllable test
!!€ Burma:               Burma+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Nom
!!€ Burmaj:              Burma+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ill
!!€ Burmas:              Burma+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ela
!!€ burmak:              Burma+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Gen+Der/k+N+Sg+Nom
!!€ burmalasj:           Burma+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Der/lasj+N+Sg+Nom

LEXICON GIRUNA-plc !!= @CODE@ For proper Kiruna. Same as ACCRA. Different lexicon because of sma.
                   :a%> ACCRA-plc ; 

LEXICON ACCRA-surplc !!= @CODE@ Vowel-final names where case endings are added directly, no cg. Names that are both surnames and place names
                            +N+Prop+Sem/Sur:%>            ACCRADECL     ;
                            +N+Prop+Sem/Plc:%>            ACCRADECL-PLC ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Sg+Attr@U.Cap.Obl@+Err/Orth:%>0000@U.Cap.Obl@ #         ;
          +N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Gen@U.Cap.Opt@:%>0000@U.Cap.Opt@ VUONAK    ;

!!€gt-norm: Veitsiluoto # Even-syllable test
!!€ Veitsiluoto:               Veitsiluoto+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Nom
!!€ Veitsiluoto:               Veitsiluoto+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Nom
!!€ Veitsiluotoj:              Veitsiluoto+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ill
!!€ Veitsiluotos:              Veitsiluoto+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ela
!!€ veitsiluotok:              Veitsiluoto+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Gen+Der/k+N+Sg+Nom
!!€ veitsiluotolasj:           Veitsiluoto+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Der/lasj+N+Sg+Nom

LEXICON ACCRA-LOAN-org !!= @CODE@ Only nominatives. Vowel-final names where case endings are added directly, no cg. organizations
 +N+Prop+Sem/Org:%> ACCRADECL-LOAN ;

!!€gt-norm: Samenes Idrettsforbund-Norge # Even-syllable test
!!€ Samenes Idrettsforbund-Norge:              Samenes Idrettsforbund-Norge+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Sg+Nom
!!$ Samenes Idrettsforbund-Norge:              Samenes Idrettsforbund-Norge+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Sg+Ela # negative test

LEXICON ACCRA-LOAN-obj !!= @CODE@ Only nominatives. Vowel-final names where case endings are added directly, no cg. Object names
 +N+Prop+Sem/Obj:%> ACCRADECL-LOAN ;

!!€gt-norm: The Norwegian Sami Experience # Even-syllable test
!!€ The Norwegian Sami Experience:        The Norwegian Sami Experience+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Sg+Nom
!!$ The Norwegian Sami Experience:        The Norwegian Sami Experience+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Sg+Ill # Negative test

LEXICON ACCRA-LOAN-plc !!= @CODE@ Only nominatives. Vowel-final names where case endings are added directly, no cg.Place names
 +N+Prop+Sem/Plc:%> ACCRADECL-LOAN-PLC ;
! +N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Gen@U.Cap.Opt@+Err/Orth:%>@U.Cap.Opt@ VUONAK ;

!!€gt-norm: Kautokeino # Even-syllable test
!!€ Kautokeino:              Kautokeino+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Nom
!!$ Kautokeinos:              Kautokeino+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Sg+Ela # negative test


LEXICON ACCRA ! Vowel-final names without Gradation.. Not in use?
 +N+Prop:%> ACCRADECL ;

!LEXICON ACCRA-LOAN-surplc ! Names that are both surnames and place names
! +N+Prop+Sem/Sur:%> ACCRADECL-LOAN ;
! +N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Sg+Attr@U.Cap.Obl@+Err/Orth:%>@U.Cap.Obl@ # ;
! +N+Prop+Sem/Plc:%> ACCRADECL-LOAN ;
! +N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Gen@U.Cap.Opt@+Err/Orth:%>@U.Cap.Opt@ VUONAK ;

LEXICON ACCRADECL
! These sublexica are irrelevant for ACCRA, but added
! for the sake of the lexicon MARJA
 @U.Cap.Obl@ ACCRA-DC ;

LEXICON ACCRADECL-ORG
! These sublexica are irrelevant for ACCRA, but added
! for the sake of the lexicon MARJA
 @U.Cap.Obl@ ACCRA-DC-ORG ;

LEXICON ACCRADECL-PLC
! These sublexica are irrelevant for ACCRA, but added
! for the sake of the lexicon MARJA
 @U.Cap.Obl@ ACCRA-DC ;
 @U.Cap.Opt@ LASJ     ;

LEXICON ACCRADECL-LOAN
! These sublexica are irrelevant for ACCRA, but added
! for the sake of the lexicon MARJA
 @U.Cap.Obl@ ACCRA-DC-LOAN ;

LEXICON ACCRADECL-LOAN-PLC
! These sublexica are irrelevant for ACCRA, but added
! for the sake of the lexicon MARJA
 @U.Cap.Obl@ ACCRA-DC-LOAN ;
 @U.Cap.Opt@ LASJ          ;


LEXICON ACCRA-DC
         +Sg+Nom:      K     ;
         +Sg+Nom:      RHyph ;
            +Ess:n     K     ;
         +Sg+Ill:Q4j   K     ; !Q4 to get e:i
         +Sg+Gen:      K     ;
         +Sg+Gen:      RHyph ;
         +Sg+Acc:v     K     ;
         +Sg+Ine:n     K     ;
         +Sg+Ela:s     K     ;
         +Pl+Nom:      K     ;
         +Pl+Gen:Q4j   K     ; !Q4 to get e:i
         +Pl+Gen:Q4j   K     ; !Q4 to get e:i
         +Pl+Acc:Q4jt  K     ;
         +Pl+Ill:Q4jda K     ;
         +Pl+Ine:Q4jn  K     ;
         +Pl+Ela:Q4js  K     ;
         +Pl+Com:Q4j   K     ; !Q4 to get e:i
         +Sg+Com:Q4jn  K     ;
 +Sg+Com+Err/Orth:X5jn  K     ; ! Norgejn

LEXICON ACCRA-DC-ORG
         +Sg+Nom:     K     ;
         +Sg+Nom:     RHyph ;
            +Ess:n    K     ;
         +Sg+Ill:Q4j  K     ; !Q4 to get e:i
         +Sg+Gen:     K     ;
         +Sg+Gen:     RHyph ;
         +Sg+Acc:v    K     ;
         +Sg+Ine:n    K     ;
         +Sg+Ela:s    K     ;
! +Pl+Nom: K ;
! +Pl+Gen:Q4j K ; !Q4 to get e:i
! +Pl+Gen:Q4j K ; !Q4 to get e:i
! +Pl+Acc:Q4jt K ;
! +Pl+Ill:Q4jda K ;
! +Pl+Ine:Q4jn K ;
! +Pl+Ela:Q4js K ;
! +Pl+Com:Q4j K ; !Q4 to get e:i
         +Sg+Com:Q4jn K     ;
 +Sg+Com+Err/Orth:X5jn K     ; ! Norgejn


LEXICON ACCRA-DC-LOAN
         +Sg+Nom:     K     ;
         +Sg+Nom:     RHyph ;
    +Ess+Err/Orth:n    K     ;
 +Sg+Ill+Err/Orth:Q4j  K     ; ! !Q4 to get e:i
 +Sg+Gen+Err/Orth:     K     ;
 +Sg+Gen+Err/Orth:     RHyph ;
 +Sg+Acc+Err/Orth:v    K     ;
 +Sg+Ine+Err/Orth:n    K     ;
 +Sg+Ela+Err/Orth:s    K     ;
! +Pl+Nom+Err/Orth: K ;
! +Pl+Gen+Err/Orth:Q4j K ; ! !Q4 to get e:i
! +Pl+Gen+Err/Orth:Q4j K ; ! !Q4 to get e:i
! +Pl+Acc+Err/Orth:Q4jt K ;
! +Pl+Ill+Err/Orth:Q4jda K ;
! +Pl+Ine+Err/Orth:Q4jn K ;
! +Pl+Ela+Err/Orth:Q4js K ;
! +Pl+Com+Err/Orth:Q4j K ; ! !Q4 to get e:i
 +Sg+Com+Err/Orth:Q4jn K     ;
 +Sg+Com+Err/Orth:X5jn K     ; ! !SUB Norgejn


!! In smj RONDANE is same as ACCRA, in use in smi because of diffrences in sme. No -lasj or -k. Last syllable is unstressed. Non-assimilated-stems.


LEXICON RONDANE-plc !!= @CODE@ E-final names, with no cg. elative -s, ill -ij. Place names
 +N+Prop+Sem/Plc:e%> RONDANEDECL ;


!!€gt-norm: Bakkane # Even-syllable test
!!€ Bakkane:               Bakkane+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Nom
!!€ Bakkane:               Bakkane+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Gen
!!€ Bakkanev:               Bakkane+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Acc
!!€ Bakkanen:               Bakkane+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ine
!!€ Bakkanij:              Bakkane+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ill
!!€ Bakkanes:              Bakkane+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ela
!!€ Bakkanijn:               Bakkane+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Com
!!€ Bakkanijda:              Bakkane+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Pl+Ill
!!€ Bakkanijs:              Bakkane+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Pl+Ela
!!$ Bakkanek:              Bakkane+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Gen+Der/k+N+Sg+Nom
!!$ Bakkanelasj:           Bakkane+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Der/lasj+N+Sg+Nom

LEXICON RONDANE-SG-plc !!= @CODE@ E-final names, with no cg. elative -s, ill -ij. Place names
 +N+Prop+Sem/Plc:e%> RONDANEDECL ;

!!€gt-norm: Bakkane # Even-syllable test
!!€ Bakkane:               Bakkane+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Nom
!!€ Bakkane:               Bakkane+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Gen
!!€ Bakkanev:               Bakkane+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Acc
