src/morphology/stems/propernouns.lexc
LEXICON ProperNoun
Debre ACCRA-plc ;
Golgota ACCRA-plc ;
Iidna ACCRA-plc ;
Iturea ACCRA-plc ;
Juobbmo ACCRA-plc ;
Laxaa ACCRA; !
Laxaa ACCRA; ! 
Liksjo ACCRA-plc ;
Nineve ACCRA-plc ;
Porsáŋgu ACCRA-plc ;
Spællá:Spællá ACCRA-plc ; !village
Sávggá ACCRA-plc ; !village
Vindela ACCRA-plc ;
Vájsá% Sámisearvi ACCRA-LOAN-org ;
Áigi ACCRA-LOAN-org ;
Brænna:Bræn'na ACCRA-plc ;
Kaskajaure+Use/-Spell:Kaska^jaure ACCRA-plc; !
Sutaivare+Use/-Spell:Sutai^vare ACCRA-plc; !
Västra ACCRA-plc ;
Affonso:Affonso9 ACCRA-plc ;
Aleppo:Aleppo9 ACCRA-plc ;
Alto:Alto9 ACCRA-plc ;
Arecibo:Arecibo9 ACCRA-plc ;
Ayacucho:Ayacucho9 ACCRA-plc ;
Belo:Belo9 ACCRA-plc ;
Betio:Betio9 ACCRA-plc ;
Bjørgo:Bjørgo9 ACCRA-plc ;
Bongo:Bongo9 ACCRA-plc ;
Borno:Borno9 ACCRA-plc ;
Brøndbo:Brønd^bo9 ACCRA-plc ;
Bøvarstogo:Bøvar^stogo9 ACCRA-plc ;
Campo:Campo9 ACCRA-plc ;
Chicago:Chicago9 ACCRA-plc ;
Chisimaio:Chisima^io9 ACCRA-plc ;
Como:Como9 ACCRA-plc ;
Cuango:Cu^ango9 ACCRA-plc ;
Diego:Di^ego9 ACCRA-plc ; !Also mal
Domingo:Domingo9 ACCRA-plc ;
Dão:Dão9 ACCRA-plc ;
Essequibo:Essequibo9 ACCRA-plc ;
Flo:Flo9 ACCRA-plc ;
Fresno:Fresno9 ACCRA-plc ;
Gozo:Gozo9 ACCRA-plc ;
Guanajuato:Gu^anaju^ato9 ACCRA-plc ;
Hakasalo:Haka^salo9 ACCRA-surplc ;
Haubro:Hau^bro9 ACCRA-plc ;
Hierro:Hi^erro9 ACCRA-plc ;
Hirvasvuopio:Hirvas^vuopio9 ACCRA-surplc ;
Homero:Homero9 ACCRA-plc ;
Høgsbro:Høgs^bro9 ACCRA-plc ;
Isoaho:Iso^aho9 ACCRA-surplc ;
Ivalo:Ivalo9 ACCRA-plc ;
Jeriko:Jeriko9 ACCRA-plc ;
Junosuando:Juno^su^ando9 ACCRA-plc ;
Kallio:Kallio9 ACCRA-surplc ;
Kallo:Kallo9 ACCRA-plc ;
Kangasaho:Kangas^aho9 ACCRA-surplc ;
Kartano:Kartano9 ACCRA-plc ;
Kavgolovo:Kavgolovo9 ACCRA-plc ;
Kilimanjaro:Kilimanjaro9 ACCRA-plc ;
Kivikko:Kivikko9 ACCRA-surplc ;
Kobro:Ko^bro9 ACCRA-plc ;
Komodo:Komodo9 ACCRA-plc ;
Kosciusko:Kosci^usko9 ACCRA-plc ;
Koutokeino:Kouto^keino9 ACCRA-plc ;
Kumamoto:Kumamoto9 ACCRA-plc ;
Kwando:Kwando9 ACCRA-plc ;
Lakso:Lakso9 ACCRA-plc ;
Lamminaho:Lammin^aho9 ACCRA-surplc ;
Lemgo:Lemgo9 ACCRA-plc ;
Likssjuo:Liks^sjuo9 ACCRA-plc ;
Livorno:Livorno9 ACCRA-plc ;
Locarno:Locarno9 ACCRA-plc ;
Lompolo:Lompolo9 ACCRA-surplc ;
Lourenço:Lourenço9 ACCRA-plc ;
Luhanko:Luhanko9 ACCRA-surplc ;
Luiro:Luiro9 ACCRA-plc ;
Luoto:Luoto9 ACCRA-surplc ;
Malabo:Malabo9 ACCRA-plc ;
Maranhão:Maranhão9 ACCRA-plc ;
Marokko:Marokko9 ACCRA-plc ;
Meksiko:Meksiko9 ACCRA-plc ;
Milano:Milano9 ACCRA-plc ;
Moisio:Moisio9 ACCRA-surplc ;
Molodečno:Molodečno9 ACCRA-plc ;
Montenegro:Montenegro9 ACCRA-plc ;
Munkebro:Munke^bro9 ACCRA-plc ;
Mussalo:Mussalo9 ACCRA-plc ;
Negro:Negro9 ACCRA-plc ;
Niihkko:Niihkko9 ACCRA-plc ;
Niinisalo:Niini^salo9 ACCRA-surplc ;
Nuevo:Nu^evo9 ACCRA-plc ;
Ohio:Ohio9 ACCRA-plc ;
Onkamo:Onkamo9 ACCRA-plc ;
Orlando:Orlando9 ACCRA-plc ;
Oviedo:Ovi^edo9 ACCRA-plc ;
Pahkasalo:Pahka^salo9 ACCRA-plc ;
Pango:Pango9 ACCRA-plc ;
Pello:Pello9 ACCRA-plc ;
Pharo:Pharo9 ACCRA-plc ;
Pizarro:Pizarro9 ACCRA-plc ;
Pohjoisaho:Pohjois^aho9 ACCRA-surplc ;
Porto-Novo:Porto-Novo9 ACCRA-plc ;
Poulsbo:Pouls^bo9 ACCRA-plc ;
Puikko:Puikko9 ACCRA-plc ;
Qinhuangdao:Qinhu^angdao9 ACCRA-plc ;
Reggio:Reggio9 ACCRA-plc ;
Rio% de% Janeiro+CmpN/None:Rio% de% Janeiro9 ACCRA-plc ; !
Ruissalo:Ruis^salo9 ACCRA-plc ;
Saint-Malo:Saint-Malo9 ACCRA-plc ;
Salo:Salo9 ACCRA-surplc ;
Sammalisto:Sammalisto9 ACCRA-plc ;
Sapporo:Sapporo9 ACCRA-plc ;
Savio:Savio9 ACCRA-surplc ;
Savo:Savo9 ACCRA-plc ;
Simo:Simo9 ACCRA-plc ;
Skorpo:Skorpo9 ACCRA-plc ;
Somero:Somero9 ACCRA-plc ;
Suvanto:Suvanto9 ACCRA-plc ;
Taivassalo:Taivas^salo9 ACCRA-plc ;
Talso:Talso9 ACCRA-plc ;
Tammisalo:Tammi^salo9 ACCRA-surplc ;
Tasso:Tasso9 ACCRA-plc ;
Tepasto:Tepasto9 ACCRA-plc ;
Tiiro:Tiiro9 ACCRA-plc ;
Tohmo:Tohmo9 ACCRA-surplc ;
Tokyo:Tokyo9 ACCRA-plc ;
Toronto:Toronto9 ACCRA-plc ;
Treviso:Treviso9 ACCRA-plc ;
Tulppo:Tulppo9 ACCRA-surplc ;
Tzepo:Tzepo9 ACCRA-plc ;
Uusikartano:Uusi^kartano9 ACCRA-surplc ;
Valio:Valio9 ACCRA-malsur ;
Valparaiso:Valparaiso9 ACCRA-plc ;
Vanamo:Vana^mo9 ACCRA-surplc ;
Veitsiluoto:Veitsi^luoto9 ACCRA-surplc ;
Viro:Viro9 ACCRA-plc ;
Ylläskaltio:Ylläskaltio9 ACCRA-plc ;
Äkäslompolo:Äkäslompolo9 ACCRA-plc ;
